Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.350

Nonacceptance and return of applications.

Any application for approval that is improperly executed, or that does not contain copies of a plan of conversion, amendments to the charter of the applicant in the form of new articles of incorporation, and preliminary offering circulars for the subscription offering and for the public offering or direct community marketing shall not be accepted for filing and shall be returned to the applicant. Any application for approval containing a materially incomplete plan of conversion or offering circular may be returned by the director to the applicant.

[ 1994 c 92 s 385; 1981 c 85 s 69.]